District of Columbia statutes.
47-1071

National Community Reinvestment Coalition; lot 20, square 222.

The real estate described for assessment and taxation purposes as lot 20, square 222, in the District of Columbia, and the buildings located thereon, owned by National Community Reinvestment Coalition, Inc., a District of Columbia nonprofit corporation, is hereby exempt from taxation for that portion of property owned by the National Community Reinvestment Coalition and occupied and used by the National Community Reinvestment Coalition or its nonprofit tenants to the extent that the property continues to be so owned and occupied, and not used for commercial purposes, subject to the provisions of §§ 47-1007 and 47-1009.

Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-60, § 2(b), 53 DCR 19
This section is referenced in § 38-2972.01.